src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ; !

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 I+Use/Circ:I 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 II+Use/Circ:II 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 III+Use/Circ:III 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 IV+Use/Circ:IV 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 V+Use/Circ:V 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 VI+Use/Circ:VI 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 VII+Use/Circ:VII 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 VIII+Use/Circ:VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 IX+Use/Circ:IX 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ; !

LEXICON ROMNUMTAG   !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Nom+Use/Circ:%> # ; !
 +Num+Gen+Use/Circ:%> # ; !
 +Num+Acc+Use/Circ:%> # ; !
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ:%.%> # ; ! !III. as ordinal.
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ:%> # ; ! !Looking for trouble...
 +Num+Use/Circ:%: ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
 +Num+Use/Circ:'  ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
 +Num+Use/Circ:%- ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
 +Num+Use/Circ:%´ ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
! +Num: ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !

LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +Gen+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>a # ; !  But here 123a 123
 +Acc+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>a # ; ! 
 +Ill+Use/Circ:%>i # ; !
 +Ill+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>ij # ; !
 +Ill+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>áj # ; !
 +Loc+Use/Circ:%>s # ; !
 +Com+Use/Circ:%>in # ; !
 +Ess+Use/Circ:%>n # ; !


! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !

LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP   !!= * __@CODE@__
 ½+Num:½ # ;
 ¹+Num:¹ # ;
 ²+Num:² # ;
 ³+Num:³ # ;
 ¼+Num:¼ # ;
 ¾+Num:¾ # ;


LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS   !!= * __@CODE@__  ! numeral as first part
 +Use/NG: Rhyph ; ! golmma-



! To be moved to compounding
LEXICON Rhyph
RNum ;

LEXICON RNum
      +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Nouns ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num 
